District of Columbia statutes.
2-225.04

Repealed

Formal contracts with bond not required for contracts less than $2,000.

Repealed.

June 26, 1912, 37 Stat. 168, ch. 182
Aug. 3, 1968, 82 Stat. 629, Pub. L. 90-455, § 4
Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 1103(e), 32 DCR 7396
1981 Ed., § 1-1108.
1973 Ed., § 1-806.